lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 9109 Y 2
SFX 9109 užti užti/408 . 300
SFX 9109 užtis užtis/408 . 300

SFX 9110 Y 2
SFX 9110 užti užti/409 . 300
SFX 9110 užtis užtis/409 . 300

SFX 9111 Y 2
SFX 9111 užti užti/410 . 300
SFX 9111 užtis užtis/410 . 300

SFX 9112 Y 2
SFX 9112 užti užti/411 . 300
SFX 9112 užtis užtis/411 . 300

SFX 9113 Y 2
SFX 9113 užti užti/412 . 300
SFX 9113 užtis užtis/412 . 300

SFX 9114 Y 2
SFX 9114 užti užti/413 . 300
SFX 9114 užtis užtis/413 . 300

SFX 9115 Y 2
SFX 9115 užti užti/414 . 300
SFX 9115 užtis užtis/414 . 300

SFX 9116 Y 2
SFX 9116 užti užti/415 . 300
SFX 9116 užtis užtis/415 . 300

SFX 9117 Y 2
SFX 9117 užti užti/416 . 300
SFX 9117 užtis užtis/416 . 300

SFX 9118 Y 2
SFX 9118 užti užti/417 . 300
SFX 9118 užtis užtis/417 . 300

SFX 9129 Y 2
SFX 9129 užti ūžta/418 . 301
SFX 9129 užtis ūžtasi/418 . 301

SFX 9130 Y 2
SFX 9130 užti ūžta/419 . 301
SFX 9130 užtis ūžtasi/419 . 301

SFX 9131 Y 2
SFX 9131 užti ūžta/420 . 301
SFX 9131 užtis ūžtasi/420 . 301

SFX 9132 Y 2
SFX 9132 užti ūžta/421 . 301
SFX 9132 užtis ūžtasi/421 . 301

SFX 9133 Y 2
SFX 9133 užti ūžta/422 . 301
SFX 9133 užtis ūžtasi/422 . 301

SFX 9134 Y 2
SFX 9134 užti ūžta/423 . 301
SFX 9134 užtis ūžtasi/423 . 301

SFX 9135 Y 2
SFX 9135 užti ūžta/424 . 301
SFX 9135 užtis ūžtasi/424 . 301

SFX 9136 Y 2
SFX 9136 užti ūžta/425 . 301
SFX 9136 užtis ūžtasi/425 . 301

SFX 9137 Y 2
SFX 9137 užti ūžta/426 . 301
SFX 9137 užtis ūžtasi/426 . 301

SFX 9147 Y 1
SFX 9147 užti ūžtie/427 . 301

SFX 9148 Y 1
SFX 9148 užtis ūžtie/428 . 301

SFX 9149 Y 2
SFX 9149 užti užo/429 . 302
SFX 9149 užtis užosi/429 . 302

SFX 9150 Y 2
SFX 9150 užti užo/430 . 302
SFX 9150 užtis užosi/430 . 302

SFX 9151 Y 2
SFX 9151 užti užo/431 . 302
SFX 9151 užtis užosi/431 . 302

SFX 9155 Y 2
SFX 9155 ilti ilti/408 . 300
SFX 9155 iltis iltis/408 . 300

SFX 9156 Y 2
SFX 9156 ilti ilti/409 . 300
SFX 9156 iltis iltis/409 . 300

SFX 9157 Y 2
SFX 9157 ilti ilti/410 . 300
SFX 9157 iltis iltis/410 . 300

SFX 9158 Y 2
SFX 9158 ilti ilti/411 . 300
SFX 9158 iltis iltis/411 . 300

SFX 9159 Y 2
SFX 9159 ilti ilti/412 . 300
SFX 9159 iltis iltis/412 . 300

SFX 9160 Y 2
SFX 9160 ilti ilti/413 . 300
SFX 9160 iltis iltis/413 . 300

SFX 9161 Y 2
SFX 9161 ilti ilti/414 . 300
SFX 9161 iltis iltis/414 . 300

SFX 9162 Y 2
SFX 9162 ilti ilti/415 . 300
SFX 9162 iltis iltis/415 . 300

SFX 9163 Y 2
SFX 9163 ilti ilti/416 . 300
SFX 9163 iltis iltis/416 . 300

SFX 9164 Y 2
SFX 9164 ilti ilti/417 . 300
SFX 9164 iltis iltis/417 . 300

SFX 9175 Y 2
SFX 9175 ilti ilia/418 . 301
SFX 9175 iltis iliasi/418 . 301

SFX 9176 Y 2
SFX 9176 ilti ilia/419 . 301
SFX 9176 iltis iliasi/419 . 301

SFX 9177 Y 2
SFX 9177 ilti ilia/420 . 301
SFX 9177 iltis iliasi/420 . 301

SFX 9178 Y 2
SFX 9178 ilti ilia/421 . 301
SFX 9178 iltis iliasi/421 . 301

SFX 9179 Y 2
SFX 9179 ilti ilia/422 . 301
SFX 9179 iltis iliasi/422 . 301

SFX 9180 Y 2
SFX 9180 ilti ilia/423 . 301
SFX 9180 iltis iliasi/423 . 301

SFX 9181 Y 2
SFX 9181 ilti ilia/424 . 301
SFX 9181 iltis iliasi/424 . 301

SFX 9182 Y 2
SFX 9182 ilti ilia/425 . 301
SFX 9182 iltis iliasi/425 . 301

SFX 9183 Y 2
SFX 9183 ilti ilia/426 . 301
SFX 9183 iltis iliasi/426 . 301

SFX 9193 Y 1
SFX 9193 ilti ilie/427 . 301

SFX 9194 Y 1
SFX 9194 iltis ilie/428 . 301

SFX 9195 Y 2
SFX 9195 ilti ylė/429 . 302
SFX 9195 iltis ylėsi/429 . 302

SFX 9196 Y 2
SFX 9196 ilti ylė/430 . 302
SFX 9196 iltis ylėsi/430 . 302

SFX 9197 Y 2
SFX 9197 ilti ylė/431 . 302
SFX 9197 iltis ylėsi/431 . 302

SFX 9201 Y 2
SFX 9201 irkti irkti/408 . 300
SFX 9201 irktis irktis/408 . 300

SFX 9202 Y 2
SFX 9202 irkti irkti/409 . 300
SFX 9202 irktis irktis/409 . 300

SFX 9203 Y 2
SFX 9203 irkti irkti/410 . 300
SFX 9203 irktis irktis/410 . 300

SFX 9204 Y 2
SFX 9204 irkti irkti/411 . 300
SFX 9204 irktis irktis/411 . 300

SFX 9205 Y 2
SFX 9205 irkti irkti/412 . 300
SFX 9205 irktis irktis/412 . 300

SFX 9206 Y 2
SFX 9206 irkti irkti/413 . 300
SFX 9206 irktis irktis/413 . 300

SFX 9207 Y 2
SFX 9207 irkti irkti/414 . 300
SFX 9207 irktis irktis/414 . 300

SFX 9208 Y 2
SFX 9208 irkti irkti/415 . 300
SFX 9208 irktis irktis/415 . 300

SFX 9209 Y 2
SFX 9209 irkti irkti/416 . 300
SFX 9209 irktis irktis/416 . 300

SFX 9210 Y 2
SFX 9210 irkti irkti/417 . 300
SFX 9210 irktis irktis/417 . 300

SFX 9221 Y 2
SFX 9221 irkti erka/418 . 301
SFX 9221 irktis erkasi/418 . 301

SFX 9222 Y 2
SFX 9222 irkti erka/419 . 301
SFX 9222 irktis erkasi/419 . 301

SFX 9223 Y 2
SFX 9223 irkti erka/420 . 301
SFX 9223 irktis erkasi/420 . 301

SFX 9224 Y 2
SFX 9224 irkti erka/421 . 301
SFX 9224 irktis erkasi/421 . 301

SFX 9225 Y 2
SFX 9225 irkti erka/422 . 301
SFX 9225 irktis erkasi/422 . 301

SFX 9226 Y 2
SFX 9226 irkti erka/423 . 301
SFX 9226 irktis erkasi/423 . 301

SFX 9227 Y 2
SFX 9227 irkti erka/424 . 301
SFX 9227 irktis erkasi/424 . 301

SFX 9228 Y 2
SFX 9228 irkti erka/425 . 301
SFX 9228 irktis erkasi/425 . 301

SFX 9229 Y 2
SFX 9229 irkti erka/426 . 301
SFX 9229 irktis erkasi/426 . 301

SFX 9239 Y 1
SFX 9239 irkti erkie/427 . 301

SFX 9240 Y 1
SFX 9240 irktis erkie/428 . 301

SFX 9241 Y 2
SFX 9241 irkti irko/429 . 302
SFX 9241 irktis irkosi/429 . 302

SFX 9242 Y 2
SFX 9242 irkti irko/430 . 302
SFX 9242 irktis irkosi/430 . 302

SFX 9243 Y 2
SFX 9243 irkti irko/431 . 302
SFX 9243 irktis irkosi/431 . 302

SFX 9247 Y 2
SFX 9247 irti irti/408 . 300
SFX 9247 irtis irtis/408 . 300

SFX 9248 Y 2
SFX 9248 irti irti/409 . 300
SFX 9248 irtis irtis/409 . 300

SFX 9249 Y 2
SFX 9249 irti irti/410 . 300
SFX 9249 irtis irtis/410 . 300

SFX 9250 Y 2
SFX 9250 irti irti/411 . 300
SFX 9250 irtis irtis/411 . 300

SFX 9251 Y 2
SFX 9251 irti irti/412 . 300
SFX 9251 irtis irtis/412 . 300

SFX 9252 Y 2
SFX 9252 irti irti/413 . 300
SFX 9252 irtis irtis/413 . 300

SFX 9253 Y 2
SFX 9253 irti irti/414 . 300
SFX 9253 irtis irtis/414 . 300

SFX 9254 Y 2
SFX 9254 irti irti/415 . 300
SFX 9254 irtis irtis/415 . 300

SFX 9255 Y 2
SFX 9255 irti irti/416 . 300
SFX 9255 irtis irtis/416 . 300

SFX 9256 Y 2
SFX 9256 irti irti/417 . 300
SFX 9256 irtis irtis/417 . 300

SFX 9267 Y 2
SFX 9267 irti erda/418 . 301
SFX 9267 irtis erdasi/418 . 301

SFX 9268 Y 2
SFX 9268 irti erda/419 . 301
SFX 9268 irtis erdasi/419 . 301

SFX 9269 Y 2
SFX 9269 irti erda/420 . 301
SFX 9269 irtis erdasi/420 . 301

SFX 9270 Y 2
SFX 9270 irti erda/421 . 301
SFX 9270 irtis erdasi/421 . 301

SFX 9271 Y 2
SFX 9271 irti erda/422 . 301
SFX 9271 irtis erdasi/422 . 301

SFX 9272 Y 2
SFX 9272 irti erda/423 . 301
SFX 9272 irtis erdasi/423 . 301

SFX 9273 Y 2
SFX 9273 irti erda/424 . 301
SFX 9273 irtis erdasi/424 . 301

SFX 9274 Y 2
SFX 9274 irti erda/425 . 301
SFX 9274 irtis erdasi/425 . 301

SFX 9275 Y 2
SFX 9275 irti erda/426 . 301
SFX 9275 irtis erdasi/426 . 301

SFX 9285 Y 1
SFX 9285 irti erdie/427 . 301

SFX 9286 Y 1
SFX 9286 irtis erdie/428 . 301

SFX 9287 Y 2
SFX 9287 irti irė/429 . 302
SFX 9287 irtis irėsi/429 . 302

SFX 9288 Y 2
SFX 9288 irti irė/430 . 302
SFX 9288 irtis irėsi/430 . 302

SFX 9289 Y 2
SFX 9289 irti irė/431 . 302
SFX 9289 irtis irėsi/431 . 302

SFX 9293 Y 2
SFX 9293 isti isti/408 . 300
SFX 9293 istis istis/408 . 300

SFX 9294 Y 2
SFX 9294 isti isti/409 . 300
SFX 9294 istis istis/409 . 300

SFX 9295 Y 2
SFX 9295 isti isti/410 . 300
SFX 9295 istis istis/410 . 300

SFX 9296 Y 2
SFX 9296 isti isti/411 . 300
SFX 9296 istis istis/411 . 300

SFX 9297 Y 2
SFX 9297 isti isti/412 . 300
SFX 9297 istis istis/412 . 300

SFX 9298 Y 2
SFX 9298 isti isti/413 . 300
SFX 9298 istis istis/413 . 300

SFX 9299 Y 2
SFX 9299 isti isti/414 . 300
SFX 9299 istis istis/414 . 300

SFX 9300 Y 2
SFX 9300 isti isti/415 . 300
SFX 9300 istis istis/415 . 300

SFX 9301 Y 2
SFX 9301 isti isti/416 . 300
SFX 9301 istis istis/416 . 300

SFX 9302 Y 2
SFX 9302 isti isti/417 . 300
SFX 9302 istis istis/417 . 300

SFX 9313 Y 4
SFX 9313 isti inta/418 . 301
SFX 9313 istis intasi/418 . 301
SFX 9313 isti enta/418 . 301
SFX 9313 istis entasi/418 . 301

SFX 9314 Y 4
SFX 9314 isti inta/419 . 301
SFX 9314 istis intasi/419 . 301
SFX 9314 isti enta/419 . 301
SFX 9314 istis entasi/419 . 301

AF 9293,9294,9313,9353,9999 # 147
AF 9201,9202,9221,9241,9999 # 165
AF 9155,9156,9175,9195,9999 # 174
AF 9247,9248,9267,9287,9999 # 190
AF 9109,9110,9129,9149,9999 # 271
