lt-LT.dic
apsivilti/174	13
apvilti/174	11
atkristi/147	11
atsipirkti/165	13
atvirti/190	11
besivilti/174	13
dužti/271	11
gniužti/271	11
išdužti/271	11
iškristi/147	11
išsipirkti/165	13
išsivirti/190	13
išvirti/190	11
kiužti/271	11
kristi/147	11
neapsivilti/174	34
neapvilti/174	33
neapvirti/190	33
neatkristi/147	33
neatpirkti/165	33
neatvirti/190	33
nebeapsipirkti/165	34
nebeatkristi/147	33
nebeatsipirkti/165	34
nebedužti/271	33
nebeiškristi/147	33
nebeišsipirkti/165	34
nebeišsivirti/190	34
nebeišvirti/190	33
nebekristi/147	33
nebenukristi/147	33
nebenusipirkti/165	34
nebenusivilti/174	34
nebepirkti/165	33
nebeprisivirti/190	34
nebeprivirti/190	33
nebesipirkti/165	34
nebesukristi/147	33
nebeužkristi/147	33
nebevirti/190	33
nebeįkristi/147	33
nebeįpirkti/165	33
nedužti/271	33
neišdužti/271	33
neiškristi/147	33
neišsipirkti/165	34
neišsivirti/190	34
neišvirti/190	33
nekristi/147	33
nenukristi/147	33
nenusipirkti/165	34
nenusivilti/174	34
nenuvilti/174	33
nenuvirti/190	33
neparkristi/147	33
nepavirti/190	33
neperpirkti/165	33
nepervirti/190	33
nepripirkti/165	33
neprisivirti/190	34
neprivirti/190	33
nesipirkti/165	34
nesivilti/174	34
nesivirti/190	34
nesudužti/271	33
nesugniužti/271	33
nesukiužti/271	33
nesukristi/147	33
nesusipirkti/165	34
nesuvirti/190	33
neužkristi/147	33
neužsipirkti/165	34
neužsivirti/190	34
neužvirti/190	33
nevirti/190	33
neįkristi/147	33
nukristi/147	11
nupirkti/165	11
nusivilti/174	13
nuvilti/174	11
papirkti/165	11
parkristi/147	11
pavirti/190	11
pirkti/165	11
prapirkti/165	11
prisipirkti/165	13
prisivirti/190	13
skilti/174	11
sudužti/271	11
sugniužti/271	11
sukiužti/271	11
sukristi/147	11
susipirkti/165	13
suvirti/190	11
teatsipirkti/165	13
tebekristi/147	11
tebenukristi/147	11
tebesivilti/174	13
tebesupirkti/165	11
teišdužti/271	11
teiškristi/147	11
teišvirti/190	11
tekristi/147	11
tenekristi/147	11
tenukristi/147	11
tenupirkti/165	11
tenusivilti/174	13
tepirkti/165	11
teįpirkti/165	11
užkristi/147	11
užsivirti/190	13
vilti/174	11
viltis/174	13
virti/190	11
